Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-173
Salvage branded certificate of title; insurance company; total loss settlement; when issued.

When an insurance company acquires a salvage vehicle through payment of a total loss settlement on account of damage, the company shall obtain the certificate of title from the owner, surrender such certificate of title to the county clerk or designated county official, and make application for a salvage branded certificate of title which shall be assigned when the company transfers ownership. An insurer shall take title to a salvage vehicle for which a total loss settlement is made unless the owner of the salvage vehicle elects to retain the salvage vehicle. If the owner elects to retain the salvage vehicle, the insurance company shall notify the department of such fact in a format prescribed by the department. The department shall immediately enter the salvage brand onto the computerized record of the vehicle. The insurance company shall also notify the owner of the owner's responsibility to comply with this section. The owner shall, within thirty days after the settlement of the loss, forward the properly endorsed acceptable certificate of title to the county clerk or designated county official in the county designated in section 60-144. The county clerk or designated county official shall, upon receipt of the certificate of title, issue a salvage branded certificate of title for the vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 73;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 19.